Massachusetts, session 194th, H2408.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 72Y of Chapter 111of the general laws is amended in the first
paragraph by inserting after the word “hospital”, for the first time, the following:-
"home health agencies as defined in chapter fifty-one K of chapter one hundred and
eleven, hospice agencies as defined in chapter fifty-seven D of chapter one hundred and eleven;"
of 1